Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Part 4

Dismissal

20-9-401. Dismissal against part of defendants.

The plaintiff may, at any time during the pendency of an action, dismiss as to any one (1) or more of the defendants and proceed against the others.

Code 1858, § 4246 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 87, § 1); Shan., § 6084; Code 1932, § 10342; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1310.

Cross-References. Dismissal of actions, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 41.

Effect of dismissal on limitations, §28-1-105.

Cited: Hooper v. Atlanta, K. & N.R.R., 107 Tenn. 712, 65 S.W. 405 (1901).